fi: Mitalipalkintotaso: 1. sija; 2. sija; 3. sija; 4. sija; 5. sija; Näyttelyn paras; Mestari; Finalisti; Kunniamaininta; Arvokkain pelaaja (MVP); Osallistuja; Voittaja; Muu
hu: Érem díjazási szintje: 1. helyezett; 2. helyezett; 3. helyezett; 4. helyezett; 5. helyezett; Kiállítás legjobbja; Bajnok; Döntős; Különdíjas; MVP; Résztvevő; Győztes; Egyéb
nl: Medaille prijsniveau: 1e plaats; 2e plaats; 3e plaats; 4e plaats; 5e plaats; Beste van de show; Kampioen; Finalist; Eervolle vermelding; MVP; Deelnemer; Winnaar; Overige
sk-SK: Úroveň ocenenia medaily: 1. miesto; 2. miesto; 3. miesto; 4. miesto; 5. miesto; Absolútny víťaz; Šampión; Finalista; Čestné uznanie; MVP; Účastník; Víťaz; Iné
sv: Medaljens utmärkelsenivå: 1:a plats; 2:a plats; 3:e plats; 4:e plats; 5:e plats; Best in show; Mästare; Finalist; Hedersomnämnande; MVP; Deltagare; Vinnare; Annat
ko: 메달 수상 등급: 1등; 2등; 3등; 4등; 5등; 최우수상; 챔피언; 결승 진출자; 장려상; MVP; 참가자; 우승자; 기타
vi: Mức độ trao huy chương: Hạng nhất; Hạng nhì; Hạng ba; Hạng tư; Hạng năm; Xuất sắc nhất triển lãm; Nhà vô địch; Người vào chung kết; Giải khuyến khích; MVP; Người tham gia; Người chiến thắng; Khác
bg-BG: Ниво на отличие на медала: 1-во място; 2-ро място; 3-то място; 4-то място; 5-то място; Най-добро в изложението; Шампион; Финалист; Почетно отличие; MVP; Участник; Победител; Друго
sl-SI: Stopnja nagrade medalje: 1. mesto; 2. mesto; 3. mesto; 4. mesto; 5. mesto; Najboljše na razstavi; Prvak; Finalist; Častna omemba; MVP; Udeleženec; Zmagovalec; Drugo
fr: Niveau de récompense de la médaille: 1re place; 2e place; 3e place; 4e place; 5e place; Meilleur de l’exposition; Champion; Finaliste; Mention honorable; MVP; Participant; Gagnant; Autre
ja: メダル授与レベル: 1位; 2位; 3位; 4位; 5位; 最優秀賞; チャンピオン; ファイナリスト; 佳作; MVP; 参加者; 優勝者; その他
el: Επίπεδο απονομής μεταλλίου: 1η θέση; 2η θέση; 3η θέση; 4η θέση; 5η θέση; Καλύτερο της έκθεσης; Πρωταθλητής; Φιναλίστ; Εύφημος μνεία; Πολυτιμότερος παίκτης (MVP); Συμμετέχων; Νικητής; Άλλο
cs: Úroveň udělení medaile: 1. místo; 2. místo; 3. místo; 4. místo; 5. místo; Vítěz výstavy; Šampion; Finalista; Čestné uznání; Nejužitečnější hráč (MVP); Účastník; Vítěz; Jiné
es: Nivel de premiación de la medalla: 1.er lugar; 2.º lugar; 3.er lugar; 4.º lugar; 5.º lugar; El mejor de la exhibición; Campeón; Finalista; Mención de honor; MVP; Participante; Ganador; Otro
nb: Medaljenivå: 1. plass; 2. plass; 3. plass; 4. plass; 5. plass; Best in show; Mester; Finalist; Hederlig omtale; MVP; Deltaker; Vinner; Annet
da: Niveau for medaljetildeling: 1. plads; 2. plads; 3. plads; 4. plads; 5. plads; Best in show; Mester; Finalist; Hædrende omtale; MVP; Deltager; Vinder; Andet
th: ระดับการมอบเหรียญรางวัล: อันดับ 1; อันดับ 2; อันดับ 3; อันดับ 4; อันดับ 5; ยอดเยี่ยมในการแสดง; แชมป์; เข้ารอบสุดท้าย; ชมเชย; MVP; ผู้เข้าร่วม; ผู้ชนะ; อื่นๆ
ru: Уровень награды медали: 1-е место; 2-е место; 3-е место; 4-е место; 5-е место; Best in show; Чемпион; Финалист; Почетное упоминание; MVP; Участник; Победитель; Другое
it: Livello del premio della medaglia: 1° posto; 2° posto; 3° posto; 4° posto; 5° posto; Best in show; Campione; Finalista; Menzione d'onore; MVP; Partecipante; Vincitore; Altro
pt-BR: Medalha nível de premiação: 1º lugar; 2º lugar; 3º lugar; 4º lugar; 5º lugar; Melhor da exposição; Campeão; Finalista; Menção honrosa; MVP; Participante; Vencedor; Outro
zh-TW: 獎牌獎項等級: 第一名; 第二名; 第三名; 第四名; 第五名; 全場總冠軍; 冠軍; 決賽入圍; 佳作; MVP; 參加獎; 優勝; 其他
hr-HR: Razina dodjele medalje: 1. mjesto; 2. mjesto; 3. mjesto; 4. mjesto; 5. mjesto; Najbolje na izložbi; Prvak; Finalist; Počasno priznanje; MVP; Sudionik; Pobjednik; Ostalo
zh-CN: 奖章授予等级: 第一名; 第二名; 第三名; 第四名; 第五名; 全场最佳; 冠军; 入围奖; 荣誉奖; MVP; 参与奖; 优胜者; 其他
ro-RO: Nivelul de premiere a medaliei: Locul 1; Locul 2; Locul 3; Locul 4; Locul 5; Cel mai bun din expoziție; Campion; Finalist; Mențiune de onoare; MVP; Participant; Câștigător; Altele
pl: Poziom nagrody medalu: 1. miejsce; 2. miejsce; 3. miejsce; 4. miejsce; 5. miejsce; Best in show; Mistrz; Finalista; Wyróżnienie; MVP; Uczestnik; Zwycięzca; Inne
tr: Madalya ödül seviyesi: 1.lik; 2.lik; 3.lük; 4.lük; 5.lik; Şovun en iyisi; Şampiyon; Finalist; Mansiyon; En Değerli Oyuncu; Katılımcı; Kazanan; Diğer
lt-LT: Medalio apdovanojimo lygis: 1-oji vieta; 2-oji vieta; 3-ioji vieta; 4-oji vieta; 5-oji vieta; Geriausias parodoje; Čempionas; Finalininkas; Garbingas paminėjimas; Naudingiausias žaidėjas (MVP); Dalyvis; Nugalėtojas; Kita
de: Auszeichnungsstufe der Medaille: 1. Platz; 2. Platz; 3. Platz; 4. Platz; 5. Platz; Best in Show; Champion; Finalist:in; Ehrenvolle Erwähnung; MVP; Teilnehmer:in; Gewinner:in; Sonstiges
en: Medal award level: 1st place; 2nd place; 3rd place; 4th place; 5th place; Best in show; Champion; Finalist; Honorable mention; MVP; Participant; Winner; Other
pt-PT: Nível de prémio da medalha: 1.º lugar; 2.º lugar; 3.º lugar; 4.º lugar; 5.º lugar; Melhor da exposição; Campeão; Finalista; Menção honrosa; MVP; Participante; Vencedor; Outro